Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2681.
Commissioner of Public Safety as Fire Marshal; deputy and assistants; HAZMAT emergency operation team.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall be ex officio Fire Marshal. The Commissioner shall annually by March 15 submit to the Governor a detailed report. A copy of this report shall be mailed to each fire department, paid or volunteer, in the State of Vermont. Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Commissioner may appoint a deputy fire marshal and other necessary assistants who shall assist him or her as State Fire Marshal.

, (c)[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 75

, § 1, eff. April 16, 1971;

1973, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. June 14, 1994;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 294p;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 294y, eff. April 1, 2005;

2005, No. 8

, § 1, eff. April 25, 2005;

2009, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 26(8)(B), eff. May 29, 2010.

§§ 2682,
2683.
Repealed.
1971, No. 75, § 2, eff. April 16, 1971.

§ 2684.
Repealed.
1979, No. 121 (Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 2685.
Record of fires.

The Fire Marshal shall keep in his or her office a record of every fire occurring in this State that causes serious injury to any person or loss or damage to property in excess of $200.00. He or she shall record all the facts concerning these fires, including statistics as to their extent and the damage caused thereby, and whether the losses were covered by insurance and, if so, in what amount. The record shall be made daily from the reports made to him or her under the provisions of this chapter. All such records shall be public, except information and testimony taken where arson is suspected.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§§ 2686,
2687.
Repealed.
1961, No. 189.

§ 2688.
Report of fire insurance company.

When required by the Commissioner, a fire insurance company or association transacting business in this State shall report to such Commissioner, after the adjustment of a loss, the amount of all policies issued by such company or association on the property destroyed or damaged, the amount paid or payable on account of such loss, and such other information relating to the matter as the Commissioner may require.

§ 2689.
Failure of officer to preform duty.

An officer referred to in section 2831 of this title who intentionally neglects to comply with any of the requirements of this chapter shall be fined not more than $100.00 nor less than $10.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 169.